Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.29.130

Notice of ballot title—Appeal.

Upon the filing of a ballot title as defined in RCW 35A.29.120, the county auditor shall forthwith notify the persons proposing the measure of the exact language of the ballot title. If the persons filing any local question covered by RCW 35A.29.120 are dissatisfied with the ballot title formulated by the attorney for the code city or by the county prosecuting attorney, they may appeal to the superior court of the county where the question is to appear on the ballot, as provided in RCW 29A.36.090.

[ 2015 c 53 s 56; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.29.130.]

NOTES: